New Mexico, session 2026, HB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million four hundred thousand dollars ($1,400,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the university of New Mexico's basic needs project. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233126.1